tex/hyph-is.tex
ök3lau
ök3le
ökl3i
ö2ko1
ökra1
ök1rá
ök1ræ
ök1s
öks2k
ök2t1
ök1ulb
ökul1d
öku1li
ök1uls
ök1ulv
ök2u1p2
ök2u1ri
ökv1an
ökv3ar.
ök1ve
ök1vil
ökv1in
ök1ví
ök1vo
öl1a
öl1á
öld2ar
öl1dre
öld2ug
ö2l1e
öl1é
öl1fa
öl1fl
öl1gir
öl1gj
öl1i
öl1j
öl1k2a
öl1ká
öl1k2i
öl1kj
öl1kú
öl1lan
ölla1s
öll1d
öl1l2ið
öl1lis
öl1lj
öl1m
ölm3u
öl1o
öl1ó
öl3ót
öl1sal
öl1sá
öl1si
öls2k
öl1s2l
öl1sn
öl3s2o
öl1svi
2ölt
öl1tak
ölt1o
öl2tr
öl1tunn
öl1ugu
öl3und
ölu1t2
öl2va
ölv1and
ölv1ans
ölv3ara
ölv3ari
öl2vis
öl1æ
ö1má
öm2b
öm2m
ömm1ó
ö2m1ó
ömp1
öm2r1
öms1
öm1u
öm2u1g
ön1da
önd2l
öndl1a
ön2g
öngl4and
öng2lið
öng2l3in
öng1læ
öng1sa
öng2v
öngv1in
ön3it
ön1í
öník2
ön2k1
ön1ó
ön2s
önu1r
ö1o
öpl1
öpl3a
öpp1
öp1u
ör1að
ör1an
ör1a2sk
ör1au
ör1á
örb2
örðalaus4
ör1e
ör1fis
örf1una
ör1g2a
örgl3
ör2g1ó
örg2s1
ör1i
ör1í2
ör1k2a
örkam1
örkamb4
ör1k2is
ör1kj
ör1kl
ör2mu
örm1un
ör1nið
ör1ní
örn1ó
ör1o
ör1ó
ör1pa
ör1pi
örp1un
örr1an
örs3ið
ör3sj
örsn2
ör3s2u
ör1ta2
ör2tó
ört3us
ör1t2v
ör1uð
ör1ugl
ör1ull
öru1m
ör1un
ör2up
öru1s
öru1t
ör1ú
ör2v1að
örv1all
ör2v1and
ör2v3ar
1ör1y
ör1æ
ö1r2æð
1öskj
öskr3
ösk2u1p2
ösk2v
öskv1i
ösl1a
ö2s1ó
ö2sp
ös2s1
2öst
öst2ir
öst1ó
2ös1u
ös2v1
ösv3a
öt1á
ö1tig
ö1tí
öt3mu
öt1ó
ö2tr
ötr1að
öt1ré
öt1sá
öt3se
öts1m
öt2s1tu
öt2s1æ
ött1ó
öt1tr
öt3ul
öt2u1ra
öt1ú
öt2v1a
öt1æ
öt1ö
ö1u
ö1vi
öv1u
öxa2
öx3ar
1öxi
1öxl
öx2n
öx3ul
ö1þ
åg1
år2d
äd3ie
äu3le
üch1
üj1
ülf2
ülff3
ül2l1
ür2r1
üs2s1
ât1
ç1a
ça2i
ç1o
š1e

}
